Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Joint Survey Committees

§ 4831.
Creation of committee.

The legislative branch of any two or more municipalities may by agreement create a joint municipal survey committee to plan for the strengthening of local governments and to promote plans for more efficient and economical operation of local government services within or by the participating municipalities. For purposes of establishing a mosquito control district under 6 V.S.A. chapter 85, a municipality may create a municipal survey committee under this section with all the powers and duties that a joint municipal survey committee possesses under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2007, No. 34

, § 2, eff. May 18, 2007.

§ 4832.
Powers and duties.

The committee shall have the following powers for any of the purposes authorized by charter or general statute:

To make surveys and studies and conduct research programs to enable municipalities to make the most efficient use of their powers by cooperation with other municipalities on a basis of mutual advantage, and thereby to provide services and facilities in a manner and pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population, and other factors influencing the needs and development of municipalities.

To provide for the distribution of information resulting from such surveys, studies, and programs.

To consult and cooperate with appropriate State, municipal, and public or private agencies in matters affecting municipal government.

To employ persons and adopt rules, regulations, and by-laws as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4833.
Officers.

The members of a joint municipal survey committee shall consist of an equal number of representatives from each municipality designated by the legislative branch. Members of the legislative branch of a municipality may serve as members of the committee. The committee shall elect from its own number a chair and secretary and other necessary officers to serve for such period as the members shall decide.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 85g.